Nevada, session 83, SB482.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada Gaming Control Board the sum of $1,060,682
for an unanticipated shortfall related to personnel expenses. This
appropriation is supplemental to that made by subsection 2 of
section 3 of chapter 148, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 748.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB482*